Utah statutes.
72-5-102.   Definitions.
As used in this part, "state transportation purposes" includes:
(1)  highway and public transportation rights-of-way, including those
necessary within cities and towns;
(2)  the construction, reconstruction, relocation, improvement, maintenance,
and mitigation from the effects of these activities on state highways and
other transportation facilities under the control of the  department;
(3)  limited access facilities, including rights of access, air, light, and
view and frontage and service roads to highways;
(4)  adequate drainage in connection with any highway, cut, fill, or channel
change and the maintenance of any highway, cut, fill, or channel change;
(5)  weighing stations, shops, offices, storage buildings and yards, and road
maintenance or construction sites;
(6)  road material sites, sites for the manufacture of road materials, and
access roads to the sites;
(7)  the maintenance of an unobstructed view of any portion of a highway to
promote the safety of the traveling public;
(8)  the placement of traffic signals, directional signs, and other signs,
fences, curbs, barriers, and obstructions for the convenience of the traveling
public;
(9)  the construction and maintenance of storm sewers, sidewalks, and highway
illumination;
(10)  the construction and maintenance of livestock highways;
(11)  the construction and maintenance of roadside rest areas adjacent to or
near any highway; and
(12)  the mitigation of impacts from public transportation projects.
